engguesser.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [Singular] [Plural] [GUESSNOUN]

LEXICON Root

Verb ;
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

[GUESSNOUN] NInfl;
cat    NInfl;
dog    NInfl;
horse  NInfl;
mouse  NInfl;
mouse[N][Plural]:mice #;
fish   NInfl;
bus    NInfl;
fox    NInfl;

LEXICON NInfl

[N][Singular]:0 #;
[N][Plural]:+s  #;
